Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-1506
Home rule charter cities; direct negotiation for products and services.

Notwithstanding the provisions for public lettings required by a city home rule charter adopted pursuant to Article XI of the Constitution, the governing body of any such city may negotiate directly with a sheltered workshop pursuant to section 48-1503.

Laws 1984, LB 540, § 5.